Washington statutes.
RCW 15.37.010

Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter:

(1) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state of Washington.

(2) "Director" means the director of the department or his or her duly appointed representative.

(3) "Person" means a natural person, individual, or firm, partnership, corporation, company, society, and association, and every officer, agent, or employee thereof. This term shall import either the singular or plural, as the case may be.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6052; 1961 c 285 s 1.]